src/scripts/Polish/unicodechars.foma
[%𝘁|%𝘁] -> t || _ ,,
[%𝘂|%𝘂] -> u || _ ,,
[%𝘃|%𝘃] -> v || _ ,,
[%𝘄|%𝘄] -> w || _ ,,
[%𝘅|%𝘅] -> x || _ ,,
[%𝘆|%𝘆] -> y || _ ,,
[%𝘇|%𝘇] -> z || _ ,,
[%𝘢|%𝘢] -> a || _ ,,
[%𝘣|%𝘣] -> b || _ ,,
[%𝘤|%𝘤] -> c || _ ,,
[%𝘥|%𝘥] -> d || _ ,,
[%𝘦|%𝘦] -> e || _ ,,
[%𝘧|%𝘧] -> f || _ ,,
[%𝘨|%𝘨] -> g || _ ,,
[%𝘩|%𝘩] -> h || _ ,,
[%𝘪|%𝘪] -> i || _ ,,
[%𝘫|%𝘫] -> j || _ ,,
[%𝘬|%𝘬] -> k || _ ,,
[%𝘭|%𝘭] -> l || _ ,,
[%𝘮|%𝘮] -> m || _ ,,
[%𝘯|%𝘯] -> n || _ ,,
[%𝘰|%𝘰] -> o || _ ,,
[%𝘱|%𝘱] -> p || _ ,,
[%𝘲|%𝘲] -> q || _ ,,
[%𝘳|%𝘳] -> r || _ ,,
[%𝘴|%𝘴] -> s || _ ,,
[%𝘵|%𝘵] -> t || _ ,,
[%𝘶|%𝘶] -> u || _ ,,
[%𝘷|%𝘷] -> v || _ ,,
[%𝘸|%𝘸] -> w || _ ,,
[%𝘹|%𝘹] -> x || _ ,,
[%𝘺|%𝘺] -> y || _ ,,
[%𝘻|%𝘻] -> z || _ ,,
[%𝙖|%𝙖] -> a || _ ,,
[%𝙗|%𝙗] -> b || _ ,,
[%𝙘|%𝙘] -> c || _ ,,
[%𝙙|%𝙙] -> d || _ ,,
[%𝙚|%𝙚] -> e || _ ,,
[%𝙛|%𝙛] -> f || _ ,,
[%𝙜|%𝙜] -> g || _ ,,
[%𝙝|%𝙝] -> h || _ ,,
[%𝙞|%𝙞] -> i || _ ,,
[%𝙟|%𝙟] -> j || _ ,,
[%𝙠|%𝙠] -> k || _ ,,
[%𝙡|%𝙡] -> l || _ ,,
[%𝙢|%𝙢] -> m || _ ,,
[%𝙣|%𝙣] -> n || _ ,,
[%𝙤|%𝙤] -> o || _ ,,
[%𝙥|%𝙥] -> p || _ ,,
[%𝙦|%𝙦] -> q || _ ,,
[%𝙧|%𝙧] -> r || _ ,,
[%𝙨|%𝙨] -> s || _ ,,
[%𝙩|%𝙩] -> t || _ ,,
[%𝙪|%𝙪] -> u || _ ,,
[%𝙫|%𝙫] -> v || _ ,,
[%𝙬|%𝙬] -> w || _ ,,
[%𝙭|%𝙭] -> x || _ ,,
[%𝙮|%𝙮] -> y || _ ,,
[%𝙯|%𝙯] -> z || _ ,,
[%𝚊|%𝚊] -> a || _ ,,
[%𝚋|%𝚋] -> b || _ ,,
[%𝚌|%𝚌] -> c || _ ,,
[%𝚍|%𝚍] -> d || _ ,,
[%𝚎|%𝚎] -> e || _ ,,
[%𝚏|%𝚏] -> f || _ ,,
[%𝚐|%𝚐] -> g || _ ,,
[%𝚑|%𝚑] -> h || _ ,,
[%𝚒|%𝚒] -> i || _ ,,
[%𝚓|%𝚓] -> j || _ ,,
[%𝚔|%𝚔] -> k || _ ,,
[%𝚕|%𝚕] -> l || _ ,,
[%𝚖|%𝚖] -> m || _ ,,
[%𝚗|%𝚗] -> n || _ ,,
[%𝚘|%𝚘] -> o || _ ,,
[%𝚙|%𝚙] -> p || _ ,,
[%𝚚|%𝚚] -> q || _ ,,
[%𝚛|%𝚛] -> r || _ ,,
[%𝚜|%𝚜] -> s || _ ,,
[%𝚝|%𝚝] -> t || _ ,,
[%𝚞|%𝚞] -> u || _ ,,
[%𝚟|%𝚟] -> v || _ ,,
[%𝚠|%𝚠] -> w || _ ,,
[%𝚡|%𝚡] -> x || _ ,,
[%𝚢|%𝚢] -> y || _ ,,
[%𝚣|%𝚣] -> z || _ ,,
[%𝚤|%𝚤] -> i || _ ,,
[%𝚥|%𝚥] -> j || _ ,,
[%ℊ|%ℊ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ℓ|%ℓ] -> l || _ ,,
[%℩|%℩] -> j || _ ,,
[%ℯ|%ℯ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ℴ|%ℴ] -> o || _ ,,
[%℺|%℺] -> q || _ ,,
[%⅁|%⅁] -> g || _ ,,
[%⅂|%⅂] -> l || _ ,,
[%⅃|%⅃] -> l || _ ,,
[%⅄|%⅄] -> y || _ ,,
[%ⅆ|%ⅆ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ⅇ|%ⅇ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ⅈ|%ⅈ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ⅉ|%ⅉ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ⅎ|%Ⅎ] -> f || _ ,,
[%🄐|%🄐] -> a || _ ,,
[%🄑|%🄑] -> b || _ ,,
[%🄒|%🄒] -> c || _ ,,
[%🄓|%🄓] -> d || _ ,,
[%🄔|%🄔] -> e || _ ,,
[%🄕|%🄕] -> f || _ ,,
[%🄖|%🄖] -> g || _ ,,
[%🄗|%🄗] -> h || _ ,,
[%🄘|%🄘] -> i || _ ,,
[%🄙|%🄙] -> j || _ ,,
[%🄚|%🄚] -> k || _ ,,
[%🄛|%🄛] -> l || _ ,,
[%🄜|%🄜] -> m || _ ,,
[%🄝|%🄝] -> n || _ ,,
[%🄞|%🄞] -> o || _ ,,
[%🄟|%🄟] -> p || _ ,,
[%🄠|%🄠] -> q || _ ,,
[%🄡|%🄡] -> r || _ ,,
[%🄢|%🄢] -> s || _ ,,
[%🄣|%🄣] -> t || _ ,,
[%🄤|%🄤] -> u || _ ,,
[%🄥|%🄥] -> v || _ ,,
[%🄦|%🄦] -> w || _ ,,
[%🄧|%🄧] -> x || _ ,,
[%🄨|%🄨] -> y || _ ,,
[%🄩|%🄩] -> z || _ ,,
[%🄪|%🄪] -> s || _ ,,
[%🇦|%🇦] -> a || _ ,,
[%🇧|%🇧] -> b || _ ,,
[%🇨|%🇨] -> c || _ ,,
[%🇩|%🇩] -> d || _ ,,
[%🇪|%🇪] -> e || _ ,,
[%🇫|%🇫] -> f || _ ,,
[%🇬|%🇬] -> g || _ ,,
[%🇭|%🇭] -> h || _ ,,
[%🇮|%🇮] -> i || _ ,,
[%🇯|%🇯] -> j || _ ,,
[%🇰|%🇰] -> k || _ ,,
[%🇱|%🇱] -> l || _ ,,
[%🇲|%🇲] -> m || _ ,,
[%🇳|%🇳] -> n || _ ,,
[%🇴|%🇴] -> o || _ ,,
[%🇵|%🇵] -> p || _ ,,
[%🇶|%🇶] -> q || _ ,,
[%🇷|%🇷] -> r || _ ,,
[%🇸|%🇸] -> s || _ ,,
[%🇹|%🇹] -> t || _ ,,
[%🇺|%🇺] -> u || _ ,,
[%🇻|%🇻] -> v || _ ,,
[%🇼|%🇼] -> w || _ ,,
[%🇽|%🇽] -> x || _ ,,
[%🇾|%🇾] -> y || _ ,,
[%🇿|%🇿] -> z || _ ;
